Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 SF 426 (3) 91 sb/js/mb S.F. 426 Section 1. Section 455B.392, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) The excessive and extraordinary 3 costs incurred by the state or its political subdivisions or 4 the agents of the state or a political subdivision for the 5 oversight and monitoring of a hazardous condition caused by 6 that person. 7 -1- SF 426 (3) 91 sb/js/mb 1/ 1